Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-406
Bigamy; when; penalty.

If any Indian who is married according to the provisions of sections 42-402 to 42-404 shall, while his or her husband or wife is living, be married to another person, either in legal form or according to Indian custom, he or she shall be guilty of bigamy and shall be punished therefor as provided by law.

Laws 1913, c. 68, § 6, p. 202;

R.S.1913, § 1612;

C.S.1922, § 1561;

C.S.1929, § 42-406;

R.S.1943, § 42-406;

Laws 1999, LB 8, § 1.

Bigamy, penalty, see section 28-701.